Maryland, session 2025, SB0295.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
– 1 –

Ch. 735 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
6–237.
WHEN A DEFENDANT IS CONVICTED OF OR PLEADS GUILTY TO A CRIME AND IS
SENTENCED TO A TERM OF IMPRISONMENT OF AT LEAST 6 MONTHS BUT NOT MORE
THAN 10 YEARS, THE COURT SHALL INFORM THE DEFENDANT ABOUT THE INCOME
TAX RECONCILIATION PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–120 OF THE TAX –
GENERAL ARTICLE.
Article – Tax – General
2–120.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “JUSTICE–INVOLVED INDIVIDUAL” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
CONVICTED OF OR PLEADS GUILTY TO A CRIME AND IS CURRENTLY SERVING OR,
WITHIN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 2 YEARS, HAS BEEN RELEASED AFTER
SERVING A TERM OF IMPRISONMENT OF AT LEAST 6 MONTHS BUT NOT MORE THAN
10 YEARS IN A STATE OR FEDERAL CORRECTIONAL FACILITY.
(3) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE INCOME TAX RECONCILIATION
PROGRAM.
(B) THERE IS AN INCOME TAX RECONCILIATION PROGRAM IN THE STATE
THAT IS ADMINISTERED BY THE COMPTROLLER.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO ALLOW JUSTICE–INVOLVED
INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE UNABLE TO FILE A STATE INCOME TAX RETURN WHILE
INCARCERATED TO:
(1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, ESTABLISH
INSTALLMENT PAYMENT PLANS TO PAY ANY UNPAID INCOME TAX THAT IS DUE FOR
ANY TAXABLE YEAR DURING WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL IS INCARCERATED; AND
(2) IF APPROVED FOR AN INSTALLMENT PAYMENT PLAN, RECEIVE A
WAIVER FOR ANY INTEREST AND PENALTIES THAT ACCRUE ON THE UNPAID INCOME
TAX.
(D) (1) FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR THAT BEGINS AFTER DECEMBER 31,
2024, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2030, A JUSTICE–INVOLVED INDIVIDUAL WHO
RECEIVES A NOTICE OF ASSESSMENT OF INCOME TAX DUE FOR A TAXABLE YEAR
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 735
DURING WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL IS INCARCERATED MAY APPLY TO THE
COMPTROLLER FOR AN INSTALLMENT PAYMENT PLAN.
(2) IF THE COMPTROLLER DETERMINES THAT THE
JUSTICE–INVOLVED INDIVIDUAL IS ELIGIBLE TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM,
THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ESTABLISH AN INSTALLMENT PAYMENT PLAN THAT
ALLOWS THE INDIVIDUAL TO PAY THE UNPAID INCOME TAX OVER A PERIOD NOT
EXCEEDING 10 YEARS.
(3) IF A JUSTICE–INVOLVED INDIVIDUAL IS APPROVED FOR AN
INSTALLMENT PAYMENT PLAN UNDER THE PROGRAM, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL
WAIVE ANY INTEREST AND PENALTIES THAT ACCRUE ON THE UNPAID INCOME TAX
DUE.
(E) (1) TO CARRY OUT THE PROGRAM, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL:
(I) IN COLLABORATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC
SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES, DEVELOP AN AWARENESS CAMPAIGN TO
INFORM THE PUBLIC AND JUSTICE–INVOLVED INDIVIDUALS ABOUT THE PROGRAM;
AND
(II) ADOPT REGULATIONS.
(2) THE REGULATIONS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MAY INCLUDE INCOME LIMITATIONS THAT ESTABLISH ELIGIBILITY
FOR THE PROGRAM.
(F) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, AND EACH DECEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE
IMPACT OF THE PROGRAM.
13–604.
(a) The rate of interest for each month or fraction of a month is the percent equal
to one–twelfth of the annual interest rate that the Comptroller sets for the calendar year
under subsection (b) of this section.
(b) On or before October 1 of each year, the Comptroller shall set the annual
interest rate for the next calendar year on refunds and money owed to the State as the
percent that equals the greater of:
(1) (i) 13% for 2016;
– 3 –

Ch. 735 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) 12% for 2017;
(iii) 11.5% for 2018;
(iv) 11% for 2019;
(v) 10.5% for 2020;
(vi) 10% for 2021;
(vii) 9.5% for 2022; and
(viii) 9% for 2023 and each year thereafter; or
(2) 3 percentage points above the average prime rate of interest quoted by
commercial banks to large businesses during the State’s previous fiscal year, based on
determination by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve Bank.
13–606.
(A) For reasonable cause, a tax collector may waive interest on unpaid tax.
(B) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL WAIVE THE AMOUNT OF ANY INTEREST
ASSESSED ON UNPAID INCOME TAX DUE UNDER THIS ARTICLE IF:
(1) THE UNPAID INCOME TAX IS DUE FOR A TAXABLE YEAR DURING
WHICH THE PERSON OWING IS INCARCERATED; AND
(2) THE PERSON APPLIES FOR AND IS PLACED ON AN INSTALLMENT
PAYMENT PLAN UNDER THE INCOME TAX RECONCILIATION PROGRAM
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–120 OF THIS ARTICLE.
13–701.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, if a person or governmental unit
fails to pay a tax when due under this article, the tax collector shall assess a penalty not
exceeding 10% of the unpaid tax.
13–714.
(A) For reasonable cause, a tax collector may waive a penalty under this subtitle.
(B) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL WAIVE ANY PENALTY UNDER THIS SUBTITLE
FOR A PERSON’S FAILURE TO PAY INCOME TAX WHEN DUE UNDER THIS ARTICLE IF:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 735
(1) THE UNPAID INCOME TAX IS DUE FOR A TAXABLE YEAR DURING
WHICH THE PERSON OWING IS INCARCERATED; AND
(2) THE PERSON APPLIES FOR AND IS PLACED ON AN INSTALLMENT
PAYMENT PLAN UNDER THE INCOME TAX RECONCILIATION PROGRAM
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–120 OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 5 –